Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 6. Foreign Limited Liability Companies
[Repealed]

§§79-6-1 through79-6-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 88, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Laws, 1993, ch. 530, § 1]

Former Chapter 6 related to the registration of foreign limited liability companies. For provisions of the Mississippi Limited Liability Company Act, see §§ 79-29-101. For the provisions governing foreign limited liability companies, see §§ 79-29-1001, et seq.